Indiana, session 2026, HB1158.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-30-5-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.246-2005,
SECTION 170, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) This section applies only to
public schools.
(b) As used in this section, "good citizenship instruction" means
integrating instruction into the current curriculum that stresses the
nature and importance of the following:
(1) Being honest and truthful.
(2) Respecting authority.
(3) Respecting the property of others.
(4) Always doing the student's personal best.
(5) Not stealing.
(6) Possessing the skills (including methods of conflict resolution)
necessary to live peaceably in society and not resorting to
violence to settle disputes.
(7) Taking personal responsibility for obligations to family and
community.
2026 IN 1158—LS 6745/DI 143


(8) Taking personal responsibility for earning a livelihood.
(9) Treating others the way the student would want to be treated.
(10) Respecting the national flag, the Constitution of the United
States, and the Constitution of the State of Indiana.
(11) Respecting the student's parents and home.
(12) Respecting the student's self.
(13) Respecting the rights of others to have their own views and
religious beliefs.
(14) The positive personal and societal outcomes associated
with:
(A) obtaining a high school diploma or high school
equivalency credential;
(B) securing full-time employment; and
(C) waiting until marriage to begin having children.
(c) The department shall:
(1) identify; and
(2) make available;
models of conflict resolution instruction to school corporations. The
instruction may consist of a teacher education program that applies the
techniques to the students in the classroom to assist school corporations
in complying with this section.
2026 IN 1158—LS 6745/DI 143